Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-539
School board; board of education; official policy respecting personnel files and student records; rules and regulations; adopt; publish; restrictions.

The school board or board of education of each school district shall adopt and publish an official policy respecting personnel files and student records, which policy shall not conflict in any manner with the rules and regulations of the State Records Administrator adopted pursuant to the Records Management Act.

Laws 1973, LB 370, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,158;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 292.

Records Management Act, see section 84-1220.